Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.579

Infant child care incentives.

(1) The legislature finds that our state suffers from an extreme shortage of infant child care, impacting the ability of parents to participate in the workforce. Further, parents returning to work after using paid family leave to care for a new child struggle to find readily available, high quality care during a time of critical growth and brain development for young children. Therefore, the legislature intends to incentivize the provision of high quality infant care.

(2) Beginning July 1, 2022, the department shall provide an infant rate enhancement for licensed or certified child care providers and birth to three early childhood education and assistance program contractors who are:

(a) Accepting state subsidy;

(b) In good standing with the early achievers quality rating and improvement system; and

(c) Caring for a child between the ages of birth and 11 months.

(3) The department must adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2021 c 199 s 404.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 199 ss 402-405: See note following RCW 43.216.577.

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.